Hawaii statutes.
[§15D-10] Receipt
of voted ballot. A valid military-overseas ballot shall be counted if it
is received by the close of the polls on the day of the election and meets the
requirements prescribed under section 15-9. [L 2012, c 226, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next